Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-546
Water service; petition; notice.

The secretary of the board shall cause notice of the filing of such petition to be given and published once each week two successive weeks in a newspaper published in the county in which said municipality is situated, which notice shall state the filing of such petition and give notice to all persons interested to appear at the office of the board, at a time named in said notice and show cause in writing, if any they have, why the petition should not be granted.

Laws 1947, c. 173, § 16(2), p. 541.